Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 4

City Housing Authorities

13-20-401. Petition for creation of authority — Notice.

Any twenty-five (25) residents of a city, and of the area within ten (10) miles from the territorial boundaries thereof, may file a petition with the city clerk setting forth that there is a need for an authority to function in the city and the surrounding area.

Upon the filing of such a petition, the city clerk shall give notice of the time, place, and purposes of a public hearing at which the council will determine the need for an authority in the city and the surrounding area.

Such notice shall be given at the city's expense by publishing a notice, at least ten (10) days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the city and the surrounding area, or, if there is no such newspaper, by posting such notice in at least three (3) public places within the city, at least ten (10) days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.3 (Williams, § 3647.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-901.

Law Reviews.

The Private Use of Public Power: The Private University and the Power of Eminent Domain; Part Three, Private University Expansion Through Section 112 — A Case Study, 27 Vand. L. Rev. 681, 719.

Attorney General Opinions. City housing authority as governmental entity under Tort Liability Act, OAG 97-072, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 71 (5/19/97).

13-20-402. Hearing — Determination.

Upon the date fixed for the hearing held upon notice as provided in § 13-20-401, an opportunity to be heard shall be granted to all residents and taxpayers of the city and the surrounding area and to all other interested persons.

After such a hearing, the council shall determine:

Whether unsanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in the city and the surrounding area; and/or

Whether there is a lack of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in the city and the surrounding area available for all the inhabitants of such city or area. In determining whether dwelling accommodations are unsafe or unsanitary, the council shall take into consideration the following:

The physical condition and age of the building;

The degree of overcrowding;

The percentage of land coverage;

The light and air available to the inhabitants of such dwelling accommodations;

The size and arrangement of the rooms;

The sanitary facilities; and

The extent to which conditions exist in such buildings which endanger life or property by fire or other causes.

If it shall determine that either or both of the above enumerated conditions exist, the council shall adopt a resolution so finding, which need not go into any detail other than the mere finding, and shall cause notice of such determination to be given to the mayor who shall thereupon appoint, as hereinafter provided, five (5) commissioners to act as an authority.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.3 (Williams, § 3647.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-902.

13-20-403. Verified application of commissioners — Contents.

The commissioners shall present to the secretary of state an application signed by them, which shall set forth without any detail other than the mere recital:

That a notice has been given and public hearing has been held as aforementioned, that the council made the aforementioned determination after such hearing, and that the mayor has appointed them as commissioners;

The name and official residence of each of the commissioners, together with a certified copy of the appointment evidencing their right to office, the date and place of induction into and taking oath of office, and that they desire the housing authority to become a public body and a body corporate and politic under this chapter;

The term of office of each of the commissioners;

The name which is proposed for the corporation; and

The location of the principal office of the proposed corporation.

The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each of the commissioners before an officer authorized by the laws of the state to take and certify oaths, who shall certify upon the application that such officer personally knows the commissioners and knows them to be the officers as asserted in the application, and that each subscribed and swore thereto in the officer's presence. The secretary of state shall examine the application and, if the secretary of state finds that the name proposed for the corporation is not identical with that of a person or of any other corporation of this state or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the secretary of state shall receive and file it, and shall record it in an appropriate book of record in the secretary of state's office.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.3 (Williams, § 3647.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-903.

13-20-404. Authority a public body corporate.

When the application has been made, filed and recorded, as herein provided, the authority shall constitute a public body corporate and politic under the name proposed in the application. The secretary of state shall make and issue to the commissioners a certificate of incorporation pursuant to this chapter, under the seal of the state, and shall record the same with the application.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.3 (Williams, § 3647.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-904.

13-20-405. Boundaries of authority.

The boundaries of such authority shall include the city and the area within ten (10) miles from the territorial boundaries of the city, but in no event shall it include the whole or a part of any other city nor any area included within the boundaries of another authority.

In case an area lies within ten (10) miles of the boundaries of more than one (1) city, such area shall be deemed to be within the boundaries of the authority embracing such area which was first established, all priorities to be determined on the basis of the time of the issuance of the aforementioned certificates by the secretary of state.

After the creation of an authority, the subsequent existence within its territorial boundaries of more than one (1) city shall in no way affect the territorial boundaries of such authority.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.3 (Williams, § 3647.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-905.

13-20-406. Resolution denying petition.

If the council, after hearing as aforementioned, shall determine that neither of the conditions enumerated in § 13-20-402 exist, it shall adopt a resolution denying the petition.

After three (3) months have expired from the date of the denial of any such petitions, subsequent petitions may be filed as aforementioned and new hearings and determinations made thereon.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.3 (Williams, § 3647.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-906.

13-20-407. Contracts of authority — Validity.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of the authority, the authority shall be conclusively deemed to have been established in accordance with this chapter. Upon proof of the issuance of the aforementioned certificate by the secretary of state, a copy of such certificate, duly certified by the secretary of state, shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action or proceedings, and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and the contents thereof.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.3 (Williams, § 3647.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-907.

Cross-References. Contracts with federal government authorized, § 13-11-110.

13-20-408. Commissioners — Appointment — Residency requirement — Terms — Quorum — Compensation — Legal services — Personnel.

An authority shall consist of five (5) commissioners appointed by the mayor, and the mayor shall designate the first chair. The commissioners who are first appointed shall be designated by the mayor to serve for terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) or five (5) years, respectively, from the date of their appointment. Pursuant to § 13-20-117(b), the term of office of the commissioner who is a resident of low-rent public housing or a housing project of a housing authority in any county having a population of not less than three hundred nineteen thousand six hundred twenty-five (319,625) nor more than three hundred nineteen thousand seven hundred twenty-five (319,725), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall be two (2) years. Thereafter, the term of office for all commissioners shall be five (5) years. A majority of the commissioners on the board shall constitute a quorum.

In any county having a population of not less than eighty-seven thousand nine hundred (87,900) nor more than eighty-eight thousand (88,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, an authority shall consist of not less than five (5) nor more than seven (7) commissioners appointed by the mayor. In such event that more than five (5) commissioners are appointed by the mayor, appointments shall be made by the mayor in such manner that the terms of no more than two (2) commissioners shall expire in any year. The term of office for all commissioners shall be five (5) years. A majority of the commissioners on the board shall constitute a quorum.

In cities of more than one hundred thousand (100,000) population, according to the federal census of 1980 or any subsequent federal census, where it is determined by the mayor that a larger number of commissioners is necessary to assure adequate representation of the larger populace, the authority may be increased by the mayor to seven (7) commissioners. In such event, appointments shall be made by the mayor in such manner that the terms of no more than two (2) commissioners shall expire in any year and it shall take four (4) commissioners to constitute a quorum.

In any county having a population of not less than sixty-two thousand three hundred (62,300) nor more than sixty-two thousand four hundred (62,400), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the authority shall be increased to seven (7) commissioners. In such county, appointments shall be made in such a manner that the terms of no more than two (2) commissioners shall expire in any year, and it shall take four (4) commissioners to constitute a quorum.

Except as provided in § 13-20-117(a) for housing authorities in any city or county with a metropolitan form of government, at least one (1) commissioner shall be a resident of public housing. For the purposes of this subsection (c), “resident of public housing” means a resident in good standing, at the time of such resident's appointment as a commissioner of public housing or Section 8 housing administered by the local housing authority.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the term of office of such resident shall be for the term provided in subsection (a) or until the person is no longer a resident of public housing, whichever first occurs.

Unless a housing authority has already appointed a resident of low-rent public housing or a housing project as a commissioner, or an appointment procedure is otherwise provided by law, the resident of public housing to be appointed as a commissioner under subdivision (c)(1)(A) shall be appointed to a vacancy which is unfilled on May 24, 2000, or if no vacancies are unfilled on May 24, 2000, to the first vacancy occurring after May 24, 2000. If the vacancy is to fill an unexpired term, such resident shall be appointed to complete the unexpired term of office created by the vacancy. If the first vacancy occurring is at the expiration of the term of office of a commissioner, then, subject to subdivision (c)(1)(B), such resident shall be appointed for the full term of office. Such commissioner position shall thereafter be filled only by a resident of public housing either to fill an unexpired term or at the end of an expired term.

The conclusion of a term shall not constitute a vacancy if the incumbent member is reappointed.

This subsection (c) shall be permissive for housing authorities with three hundred (300) or fewer housing units.

A commissioner shall hold office until the commissioner's successor has been appointed and qualified. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term. The mayor shall file with the city clerk a certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner. A commissioner shall receive no compensation for such commissioner's services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses incurred in the discharge of the commissioner's duties, unless otherwise authorized by local ordinance. No commissioner may be a city official. In no case shall compensation be paid to any commissioner from state or federal funds.

When the office of the first chair of the authority becomes vacant, the authority shall elect a chair from among its members. An authority shall select from among its members a vice chair, and it may employ a secretary, who shall be executive director, technical experts and such other officers, agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. An authority may call upon the corporation counsel or chief law officer of the city for such legal services as it may require or it may employ its own counsel and legal staff. An authority may delegate to one (1) or more of its agents or employees such powers or duties as it may deem proper. An employee of a housing authority in counties having a population of not less than three hundred twenty thousand (320,000) nor more than four hundred eighty thousand (480,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall not be deemed, as a result of employment by such housing authority, to be an employee of any city or municipality.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, membership of an authority shall be increased in accordance with § 13-20-415(c).

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.4 (Williams, § 3647.5); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-908; Acts 1984, ch. 941, § 1; 1988, ch. 568, § 2; 1989, ch. 82, § 1; 1992, ch. 654, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 224, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 822, § 1; 2002, ch. 542, § 1; 2003, ch. 23, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Advisory board, creation, § 13-20-208.

Residence of commissioners, § 13-20-103.

Attorney General Opinions. Residency requirements for city housing authority commissioners, OAG 99-075, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (4/5/99).

Residency requirement for commissioners of city housing authority, OAG 04-092, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 101 (5/13/04).

13-20-409. Duty of the authority and commissioners.

The authority and its commissioners shall be under a statutory duty to comply or to cause compliance strictly with all provisions of this chapter, and the laws of the state and in addition thereto with each and every term, provision and covenant in any contract of the authority on its part to be kept or performed.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.5 (Williams, § 3647.6); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-909.

Cross-References. Bonds, form and sale, § 13-20-602.

Bonds, trust indentures and mortgages, powers of authority, § 13-20-603.

Bonds, types, § 13-20-601.

Cooperation of authorities in exercise of powers, § 13-20-107.

Meetings of commissioners, § 13-20-103.

Mortgaging, power to when project financed with aid of government, § 13-20-604.

Powers of housing authority, § 13-20-104.

13-20-410. Interest of commissioners or employees in contracts.

All commissioners, officers and employees of housing authorities are subject to the conflict of interest provisions contained in §§ 12-4-101 and 12-4-102.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.6 (Williams, § 3647.7); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-910; Acts 1998, ch. 947, §§ 1, 2.

13-20-411. Removal of commissioners — Hearing.

The mayor may remove a commissioner for inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, but only after the commissioner shall have been given a copy of the charges against such commissioner, which may be made by the mayor, at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing thereon and had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

Any obligee of the authority may file with the mayor written charges that the authority is violating willfully any law of the state or any term, provision or covenant in any contract to which the authority is a party. The mayor shall give each of the commissioners a copy of such charges at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing thereon and an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel, and shall within fifteen (15) days after receipt of such charges remove any commissioner of the authority who is found to have acquiesced in any such willful violation.

A commissioner shall be deemed to have acquiesced in a willful violation by the authority of a law of this state or of any term, provision or covenant contained in a contract to which the authority is a party, if, before a hearing is held on the charges against the commissioner, the commissioner has not filed with the authority a written statement of the commissioner's objections to or lack of participation in such violation.

In the event of the removal of any commissioner, the mayor shall file in the office of the city clerk a record of the proceedings, together with the charges made against the commissioner and the findings thereon.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.7 (Williams, § 3647.8); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-911.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1959 Tennessee Survey, 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1257.

13-20-412. Reports and recommendations.

The authority shall at least once a year, file with the mayor of the city a report of its activities for the preceding year, and shall make any recommendations with reference to any additional legislation or other action that may be necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 27; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.23 (Williams, § 3647.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-912.

13-20-413. Housing projects — Operation not for profit.

It is declared to be the policy of this state that each housing authority shall manage and operate its housing projects in an efficient manner so as to enable it to fix the rentals for dwelling accommodations at the lowest possible rates consistent with its providing decent, safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations, and that no housing authority shall construct or operate any such project for profit, or as a source of revenue to the city. To this end, an authority shall fix the rentals for dwellings in its projects at no higher rates than it shall find to be necessary in order to produce revenues which, together with all other available moneys, revenues, income and receipts of the authority from whatever sources derived, will be sufficient to:

Pay, as the same become due, the principal of and interest on the bonds of the authority;

Meet the cost of, and to provide for, maintaining and operating the projects, including the cost of any insurance on its property or bonds, and the administrative expenses of the authority; and

Create, during not less than the six (6) years immediately succeeding its issuance of any bonds, a reserve sufficient to meet the largest principal and interest payments which will be due on such bonds in any one (1) year thereafter and to maintain such reserve.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 31, as added by Acts 1937, ch. 234, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.24 (Williams, § 3647.29a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-913.

Cross-References. Blighted areas, title 13, ch. 20, part 2.

Housing research and studies, § 13-20-106.

Rentals and tenant selection, § 13-20-113.

Zoning and building laws, housing projects subject to, § 13-20-112.

13-20-414. Action of city or municipality by resolution.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all action authorized to be taken under such law by the council or other governing body of any city or of any municipality may be by resolution adopted by a majority of all the members of its council or other governing body, which resolution may be adopted at the meeting of the council or other governing body at which such resolution is introduced and shall take effect immediately upon such adoption, and no such resolution need be published or posted.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 45, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29W (Williams, § 3647.33); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-914.

13-20-415. Operations of authority in other municipalities or counties.

In addition to its other powers, a housing authority created for a city may exercise any or all of its powers within the territorial boundaries of any other municipality not included in the area of operation of such housing authority, for the purpose of planning, undertaking, financing, constructing and operating a housing project or projects within such municipality; provided, that a resolution has been adopted:

By the governing body of such municipality in which the authority is to exercise its powers; and

By any housing authority theretofore established by such municipality and authorized to exercise its powers therein declaring that there is a need for the housing authority of the aforementioned city to exercise its powers within such municipality.

A municipality has the same powers to furnish financial and other assistance to a housing authority exercising its powers within such municipality under this section as though the municipality were within the area of operation of such authority.

If a housing authority plans, undertakes, finances, constructs or operates a housing project or projects within the territorial boundaries of any other municipality not included in the area of operation of such housing authority or in an unincorporated area in a county other than the one in which such housing authority is located, then the board of such authority shall be expanded. A commissioner shall be appointed from each such county and/or municipality and such commissioner shall be a resident of the municipality or county, if such project is in an unincorporated area, in which the project or projects are located. The mayor of such municipality or the county legislative body, respectively, shall appoint such commissioner. The term of office, compensation, qualifications and duties of commissioners appointed pursuant to this section shall be the same as other commissioners appointed pursuant to § 13-20-408.

This subsection (c) shall only apply to any municipality having a population of not less than two thousand three hundred (2,300) nor more than two thousand three hundred fifty (2,350) in any county having a population of not less than sixty-seven thousand three hundred (67,300) nor more than sixty-seven thousand four hundred (67,400) and to any municipality in any county having a population of:

not less than nor more than

11,700 11,800

14,800 14,850

16,600 16,700

19,200 19,300

24,575 24,600

34,800 34,900

according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and the housing authority of any such municipality shall have all of the rights and responsibilities granted by this chapter.

This subdivision (c)(2) shall apply to projects entered into prior to April 17, 1990, but shall not be construed to affect, modify, abrogate, limit or alter any decision, vote, contract, right or obligation entered into prior to the appointment of new commissioners pursuant to this subdivision (c)(2).

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 42, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29F (Williams, § 3647.29r); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-915; Acts 1989, ch. 82, §§ 2, 4; 1990, ch. 916, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 82, § 3 provided that subsection (c) shall apply to projects entered into prior to April 5, 1989 but shall not be construed to affect, modify, abrogate, limit or alter any decision, vote, contract, rights or obligations entered into prior to the appointment of new commissioners pursuant to the provisions of subsection (c).

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-20-416. Findings required for authority to operate in municipality.

No governing body of a city or other municipality shall adopt a resolution as provided in § 13-20-415 or § 13-20-503 declaring that there is a need for a housing authority, other than a housing authority established by such municipality, to exercise its powers within such municipality, unless a public hearing has first been held by the governing body and unless the governing body has found in substantially the following terms:

Unsanitary or unsafe inhabitated dwelling accommodations exist in such municipality or there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such municipality available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford; and

These conditions can be best remedied through the exercise of the aforementioned housing authority's powers within the territorial boundaries of such municipality;

provided, that such findings shall not have the effect of thereafter preventing such municipality from establishing a housing authority or joining in the creation of a consolidated housing authority or the increase of the area of operation of a consolidated housing authority. The clerk, or the officer with similar duties, of the city or other municipality shall give notice of the public hearing, and such hearing shall be held in the manner provided in § 13-20-402 for a public hearing by a council to determine the need for a housing authority in the city.

During the time that, pursuant to these findings, a housing authority has outstanding, or is under contract to issue, any evidence of indebtedness for a project within the city or other municipality, no other housing authority may undertake a project within such municipality without the consent of the housing authority which has such outstanding indebtedness or obligation.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 43, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29G (Williams, § 3647.29s); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-916.

13-20-417. Advances to housing authority.

When any housing authority which is created for any city becomes authorized to transact business and exercise its powers therein, the governing body of the city shall immediately make an estimate of the amount of money necessary for the administrative expenses and overhead of such housing authority during the first year thereafter, and shall appropriate such amount to the authority out of any moneys in such city not appropriated to some other purposes. The moneys so appropriated shall be paid to the authority as a donation. Any municipality located in whole or in part within the area of operation of a housing authority shall have the power from time to time to lend or donate money to the authority or to agree to take such action. The housing authority, when it has money available therefor, shall make reimbursement for all such loans made to it.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 45, § 8, as added by Acts 1937, ch. 225, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29X (Williams, § 3647.36a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-917.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal authority to make or guarantee loans to local housing authority, OAG 98-0104, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 104 (6/11/98).

City development of residential real estate, OAG 98-042, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (2/17/98).

13-20-418. Consolidated housing authority.

If the governing body of each of two (2) or more municipalities by resolution declares that there is a need for one (1) housing authority for all of such municipalities to exercise in such municipalities the powers and other functions prescribed for a housing authority, a public body corporate and politic to be known as a consolidated housing authority, with such corporate name as it selects, shall thereupon exist for all such municipalities, and exercise its powers and other functions within its area of operation, as herein defined, including the power to undertake projects therein, and thereupon any housing authority created for any of such municipalities shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed of its real property to the consolidated housing authority; provided, that the creation of a consolidated housing authority and the finding of need therefor shall be subject to the same provisions and limitations of this chapter as are applicable to the creation of a regional housing authority, and that all of the provisions of such law applicable to regional housing authorities and the commissioners thereof shall be applicable to consolidated housing authorities and the commissioners thereof. The area of operation or boundaries of a consolidated housing authority shall include all of the territory within the boundaries of each municipality joining in the creation of such authority, together with the territory within ten (10) miles of the boundaries of each such municipality, except that such area of operation may be changed to include or exclude any municipality or municipalities (with its aforementioned surrounding territory) in the same manner and under the same provisions as provided in such law for changing the area of operation of a regional housing authority by including or excluding a contiguous county or counties.

For all such purposes, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“County” means “municipality”;

“County housing authority” and “regional housing authority” mean “housing authority of the city” and “consolidated housing authority,” respectively; and

“County legislative body” means governing body, except in § 13-20-507, where it shall be construed as meaning “mayor” or other executive head of the municipality.

The governing body of a municipality for which a housing authority has not been created may adopt the above resolution if it first determines that there is a need for a housing authority to function in the municipality, which determination shall be made in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as the determination required in § 13-20-402 for the creation of a housing authority for a city; provided, that the governing body of the municipality may, without a petition therefor, hold a hearing to determine the need for a housing authority to function therein.

Except as otherwise provided herein, a consolidated housing authority and the commissioners thereof shall, within the area of operation of such consolidated housing authority, have the same functions, rights, powers, duties, privileges, immunities and limitations as those provided for housing authorities created for cities, counties, or groups of counties, and the commissioners of such housing authorities, in the same manner as though all law applicable to housing authorities created for cities, counties, or groups of counties were applicable to consolidated housing authorities.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 41, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29E (Williams, § 3647.29q); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-918.

13-20-419. Security force.

In cities with a population of over one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, each housing authority, managing and operating housing projects for persons of low income under this chapter may, if funds can be provided for this purpose, provide a security force for such project to assure the safety of the tenants and their property and the safety and the protection of the premises.

While acting in such capacity, an officer of such force has the same authority as a law enforcement officer as defined in § 39-11-106(a), and may receive a written directive to carry a handgun under § 39-17-1315 if such officer meets the qualifications in § 38-8-106 and the training requirements of § 38-8-107(a). While acting in such capacity, such officer has the authority to make arrests for offenses committed on the property of such public housing project.

Acts 1973, ch. 240, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 13-919; Acts 1997, ch. 126, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Public housing authority officers may attend basic and specialized schools at the Tennessee Law Enforcement Academy, OAG 00-096, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (5/22/00).

Public housing authority officers are required to attend state or POST approved in-service training if they intend to have the same authority as a law enforcement officer and carry a handgun, OAG 00-096, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (5/22/00).

Public housing authority officers will be regulated by the Tennessee POST commission if they have the same authority as a law enforcement officer and if they carry a handgun, OAG 00-096, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (5/22/00).

Public housing authority officers are required to attend basic police recruit training at a state or POST approved training academy if they have the same authority as a law enforcement officer and carry a handgun, OAG 00-096, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (5/22/00).

Public housing authority officers may legally transport their own prisoners, OAG 00-096, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (5/22/00).

Public housing authority officers have jurisdiction on public roads and rights-of-way if they are located on the property of the public housing project, OAG 00-096, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (5/22/00).

Public housing authority officers may legally form mutual aid and other agreements with other law enforcement agencies, OAG 00-096, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (5/22/00).

Public housing authority officers may also be called “law enforcement officers,” OAG 00-096, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (5/22/00).

Public housing authority officers have a duty to act if they observe criminal conduct in the area of their jurisdiction, OAG 00-150, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 152 (10/5/00).

T.C.A. § 13-20-419 does not require law enforcement officers from another agency to transport public housing authority arrestees, OAG 00-150, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 152 (10/5/00).

Public housing authority officers are local, rather than federal or state, officers, OAG 00-150, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 152 (10/5/00).

T.C.A. § 13-20-419 does not provide that public housing authority officers are under a civil service system; however, the nature of the local civil service system and/or the agreement between the authority and the municipality may provide for coverage, OAG 00-150, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 152 (10/5/00).

Public housing officers have the police powers necessary to enforce the laws of the state within their jurisdiction, OAG 00-150, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 152 (10/5/00).